Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1823
Criminal and civil proceedings to compel compliance.

The commission may compel compliance with the State Natural Gas Regulation Act and compel compliance with the orders of the commission by proceeding in mandamus, injunction, or other appropriate civil remedies or by appropriate criminal proceedings in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 23.